Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Penalties

189.990.
Penalties. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

189.020

to

189.040

, subsection (1) or (4) of KRS

189.050

, KRS

189.060

to

189.080

, subsections (1) to (3) of KRS

189.090

, KRS

189.100

,

189.110

,

189.130

to

189.160

, subsections (2) to (4) of KRS

189.190

, KRS

189.200

,

189.285

,

189.290

,

189.300

to

189.360

, KRS

189.380

, KRS

189.400

to

189.430

, KRS

189.450

to

189.458

, KRS

189.4595

to

189.480

, subsection (1) of KRS

189.520

, KRS

189.540

, KRS

189.570

to

189.590

, except subsection (1)(b) or (6)(b) of KRS

189.580

, KRS

189.345

, subsection (6) of KRS

189.456

, and

189.960

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. Any person who violates subsection (1)(a) of KRS

189.580

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both, unless the accident involved death or serious physical injury and the person knew or should have known of the death or serious physical injury, in which case the person shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Any person who violates paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of KRS

189.390

shall be fined not less than eleven dollars ($11) nor more than thirty dollars ($30). Neither court costs nor fees shall be taxed against any person violating paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of KRS

189.390

.

Any person who violates the weight provisions of KRS

189.212

,

189.221

,

189.222

,

189.226

,

189.230

,

189.270

, or

189.2713

shall be fined two cents ($0.02) per pound for each pound of excess load when the excess is five thousand (5,000) pounds or less. When the excess exceeds five thousand (5,000) pounds the fine shall be two cents ($0.02) per pound for each pound of excess load, but the fine levied shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100) and shall not be more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS

189.271

and is operating on a route designated on the permit shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100); otherwise, the penalties in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall apply.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (2) or (3) of KRS

189.050

, subsection (4) of KRS

189.090

, KRS

189.221

to

189.230

,

189.270

,

189.2713

,

189.280

, or the dimension provisions of KRS

189.212

, for which another penalty is not specifically provided shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS

177.985

while operating on a route designated in KRS

177.986

shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who operates a vehicle with a permit under KRS

177.985

in excess of eighty thousand (80,000) pounds while operating on a route not designated in KRS

177.986

shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Nothing in this subsection or in KRS 189.221 to

189.228

shall be deemed to prejudice or affect the authority of the Department of Vehicle Regulation to suspend or revoke certificates of common carriers, permits of contract carriers, or drivers’ or chauffeurs’ licenses, for any violation of KRS 189.221 to

189.228

or any other act applicable to motor vehicles, as provided by law.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of KRS

189.190

shall be fined not more than fifteen dollars ($15).

Any person who violates subsection (5) of KRS

189.190

shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200).

Any person who violates subsection (1) of KRS

189.210

shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any peace officer who fails, when properly informed, to enforce KRS

189.210

shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

All fines collected under this subsection, after payment of commissions to officers entitled thereto, shall go to the county road fund if the offense is committed in the county, or to the city street fund if committed in the city.

Any person who violates KRS

189.370

shall for the first offense be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or imprisoned not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days, or both. For each subsequent offense occurring within three (3) years, the person shall be fined not less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not less than sixty (60) days nor more than six (6) months, or both. The minimum fine for this violation shall not be subject to suspension. A minimum of six (6) points shall be assessed against the driving record of any person convicted.

Any person who violates KRS

189.500

shall be fined not more than fifteen dollars ($15) in excess of the cost of the repair of the road.

Any person who violates KRS

189.510

or KRS

189.515

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

Any peace officer who violates subsection (2) of KRS

189.520

shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates KRS 189.530(1) shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned not less than thirty (30) days nor more than twelve (12) months, or both.

Any person who violates KRS 189.530(2) shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

189.550

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Any person who violates subsection (3) of KRS

189.560

shall be fined not less than thirty dollars ($30) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

The fines imposed by paragraph (a) of subsection (3) and subsections (6) and (7) of this section shall, in the case of a public highway, be paid into the county road fund, and, in the case of a privately owned road or bridge, be paid to the owner. These fines shall not bar an action for damages for breach of contract.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

189.120

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

189.575

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25).

Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS

189.231

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

Any person who violates restrictions or regulations established by the secretary of transportation pursuant to subsection (3) of KRS

189.231

shall, upon first offense, be fined one hundred dollars ($100) and, upon subsequent convictions, be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for thirty (30) days, or both.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

189.565

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

In addition to the penalties prescribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection, in case of violation by any person in whose name the vehicle used in the transportation of inflammable liquids or explosives is licensed, the person shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who abandons a vehicle upon the right-of-way of a state highway for three (3) consecutive days shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned for not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days.

Every person violating KRS

189.393

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor, unless the offense is being committed by a defendant fleeing the commission of a felony offense which the defendant was also charged with violating and was subsequently convicted of that felony, in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor.

Any law enforcement agency which fails or refuses to forward the reports required by KRS

189.635

shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in KRS

17.157

.

A person who operates a bicycle in violation of the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS

189.287

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates KRS

189.860

shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Any person who violates KRS

189.754

shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300).

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 189.125(3)(a) shall be fined fifty dollars ($50). This fine shall be subject to prepayment. A fine imposed under this subsection shall not be subject to court costs pursuant to KRS

24A.175

, additional court costs pursuant to KRS

24A.176

, the fee imposed pursuant to KRS

24A.1765

, or any other additional fees or costs.

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS

189.125

(3)(b) shall not be issued a uniform citation, but shall instead receive a courtesy warning up until July 1, 2009. For a violation on or after July 1, 2009, the person shall be fined thirty dollars ($30). This fine shall be subject to prepayment. A fine imposed under this subsection shall not be subject to court costs pursuant to KRS

24A.175

, additional court costs pursuant to KRS

24A.176

, a fee imposed pursuant to KRS

24A.176

5, or any other additional fees or costs. A person who has not been previously charged with a violation of KRS

189.125

(3)(b) may elect to acquire a booster seat meeting the requirements of KRS 189.125. Upon presentation of sufficient proof of the acquisition, the charge shall be dismissed and no fees or costs shall be imposed.

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 189.125(6) shall be fined an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25). This fine shall be subject to prepayment. A fine imposed under this subsection shall not be subject to court costs pursuant to KRS

24A.175

, additional court costs pursuant to KRS

24A.176

, the fee imposed pursuant to KRS

24A.1765

, or any other additional fees or costs.

Fines levied pursuant to this chapter shall be assessed in the manner required by KRS

534.020

, in amounts consistent with this chapter. Nonpayment of fines shall be governed by KRS

534.020

and

534.060

.

A licensed driver under the age of eighteen (18) charged with a moving violation pursuant to this chapter as the driver of a motor vehicle may be referred, prior to trial, by the court to a diversionary program. The diversionary program under this subsection shall consist of one (1) or both of the following:

Execution of a diversion agreement which prohibits the driver from operating a vehicle for a period not to exceed forty-five (45) days and which allows the court to retain the driver’s operator’s license during this period; and

Attendance at a driver improvement clinic established pursuant to KRS

186.574

. If the person completes the terms of this diversionary program satisfactorily the violation shall be dismissed.

A person who violates the provisions of subsection (2) or (3) of KRS

189.459

shall be fined two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The fines and costs for a violation of subsection (2) or (3) of KRS

189.459

shall be collected and disposed of in accordance with KRS

24A.180

. Once deposited into the State Treasury, ninety percent (90%) of the fine collected under this subsection shall immediately be forwarded to the personal care assistance program under KRS

205.900

to

205.920

. Ten percent (10%) of the fine collected under this subsection shall annually be returned to the county where the violation occurred and distributed equally to all law enforcement agencies within the county.

Any person who violates KRS

189.292

or

189.294

shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25) for the first offense and fifty dollars ($50) for each subsequent offense.

Any person who violates KRS 189.281(5) or (7)(b) shall be subject to a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). This fine shall be subject to prepayment. A fine imposed under this subsection shall not be subject to court costs pursuant to KRS

24A.175

, additional costs pursuant to KRS

24A.176

, the fee imposed pursuant to KRS

24A.1765

, or any other additional fees or costs.

History.

1376r-2, 1376r-10, 2739g-34a, 2739g-34b, 2739g-46a, 2739-53b, 2739g-65, 2739g-69ee, 2739g-93, 2739i-2, 2896a-15, 4345, 4345a-6, 4346, 4346a-5, 4348, 4353b-4: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 96; 1948, ch. 171, § 2; 1950, ch. 48, § 4; 1950, ch. 96, § 2; 1950, ch. 97, §§ 2, 3; 1950, ch. 115, § 9; 1952, ch. 206, § 1; 1956, ch. 23, § 1, 1956, ch. 35, § 2; 1956, ch. 125, § 3; 1970, ch. 92, § 60; 1972, ch. 128, § 2; 1972, ch. 203, § 38; 1972, ch. 299, § 2(4); 1974, ch. 101, § 7; 1974, ch. 217, § 2; 1974, ch. 258 § 5; 1974, ch. 335, § 2; 1974, ch. 345, § 1(3); 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 36, § 2, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 46, § 11, effective June 17, 1978, ch. 101, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 54, effective June 17, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7 § 5, effective July 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 49, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 305, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 165, § 20(1) to (24), effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 72, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 232, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 262, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 293, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 347, § 2, effective April 10, 1988; 1990, ch. 400, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 143, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 229, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 39, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 21, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 124, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 179, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 484, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 69, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 319, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 449, § 1, effective April 21, 2000; 2000, ch. 467, § 25, effective October 1, 2000; 2000, ch. 481, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 512, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 183, § 18, effective August 1, 2002; 2004, ch. 131, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 109, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 110, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 173, § 32, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 180, § 10, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 108, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2008, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 110, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 21, § 4, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 146, § 4, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 158, § 9, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 63, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 126, § 5, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 186, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.

189.991.
Penalty. [Repealed.]

189.992.
Penalty. [Repealed.]

189.993.
Penalties.

Any person who violates KRS

189.045

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of KRS

189.095

shall be fined sixty dollars ($60) and costs of prosecution.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

189.205

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

189.375

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates KRS

189.505

shall be fined not less than sixty dollars ($60) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or be imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

Any person found violating any provision of KRS

189.820

or

189.830

is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than thirty-five dollars ($35).

Any person who violates KRS

189.920

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both. In the case of a private vehicle not authorized to use emergency lights under KRS

189.920

, all lighting and other equipment used in violation of KRS

189.910

to

189.950

shall be confiscated and forfeited to the county in which the offense occurred.

Any person who violates KRS

189.930

shall be fined not less than sixty dollars ($60) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

Any person who violates KRS

189.940

shall be fined not less than sixty dollars ($60) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both. In the case of a private vehicle, except as outlined in subsection (11) of this section, all lighting and other equipment used in violation of KRS

189.910

to

189.950

shall be confiscated and forfeited to the county in which the offense occurred.

If a member of a regular or volunteer fire department, ambulance service, or rescue squad violates any provisions of subsection (6) of KRS

189.940

, he shall, in addition to any other penalty provided under KRS

189.990

or this section, be immediately dismissed from his membership or employment with the fire department, ambulance service, or rescue squad and shall be disqualified from being employed by or being a member of any fire department, ambulance service, or rescue squad in the Commonwealth for a period of three (3) years. Upon conviction of a second offense he shall be permanently barred from employment or membership in any fire department, ambulance service, rescue squad, police department, or sheriff’s office in the Commonwealth, nor shall he be permitted to operate any public safety vehicle as defined in KRS

189.910

.

Any person who violates KRS

189.950

(3)shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, two hundred dollars ($200) for the second offense, and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each subsequent offense.

Except as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, any person who violates KRS

189.950

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both. In the case of a privately owned vehicle, all lighting and other equipment used or installed in violation of KRS

189.910

to 189.950 shall be confiscated and forfeited to the county in which the offense occurred.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter for which no penalty is otherwise provided shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense, except that no penalty shall be assessed for a violation of KRS 189.580(1)(b) or (6)(b).

No producer or processor of natural resources shall allow the transporting of natural resources over the highways of the Commonwealth in excess of the weight limits without possessing a resource recovery road hauling permit. Violation for hauling in excess of prescribed limits without possession of a permit or transporting natural resources over prescribed limits of the resource recovery road hauling permit shall be not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation and shall be deposited in the resource recovery road fund.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 18, § 2; 1966, ch. 113, § 3; 1968, ch. 152, § 123; 1970, ch. 45, § 4; 1970, ch. 92, § 61; 1970, ch. 93, § 6; 1970, ch. 117, § 1; 1972, ch. 203, § 39; 1978, ch. 101, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 102, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 6, effective July 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 203, § 12(5), effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 220, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 2006, ch. 109, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 110, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 173, § 33, effective July 12, 2006; 2017 ch. 79, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

346.185

, which imposes an additional cost of ten dollars for all offenses for which imprisonment may be imposed, only applies to traffic offenses for which a term of imprisonment may be imposed for a violation.

OAG 82-332

.

189.994.
Penalty for unspecified violations. [Repealed.]

189.995.
Penalties. [Repealed.]

189.999.
Prepayment of fines subject to certain conditions.

All offenses under this chapter classified as violations shall be prepayable, except for:

Any offense that could result in license suspension or revocation by the court or the Transportation Cabinet;

Any offense relating to KRS

189.393

,

189.520

, or

189.580

;

When the defendant is speeding more than twenty-five (25) miles per hour over the posted speed limit under KRS

189.394

;

An offense where evidence of the offense or of commission of another offense is seized by the officer and the citation is so marked and a court date set;

The offense is cited with another offense that is not prepayable;

When the defendant is under the age of eighteen (18); or

An arrest is made under KRS

431.015

.

In the event that a prepayable offense is cited with another offense that is not prepayable, a court appearance shall be required on all of the offenses as required by KRS

431.452

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 512, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 81, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2019 ch. 40, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2014). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 81, sec. 3 provided that the amendments made to this statute in Section 1 of that Act shall be known as the “Denzel Steward Act of 2014.”